Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.520

Building constructed, used, or converted to nightclub—In accordance with chapter.

No building shall be constructed for, used for, or converted to, occupancy as a nightclub except in accordance with this chapter.

[ 2005 c 148 s 3.]